District of Columbia statutes.
44-421

Rules.

The SHPDA shall, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules within the 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 22, 43 DCR 4535

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-404, § 44-407, § 44-408, § 44-409, and § 44-410.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-371.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 32-381.1 to 32-381.17 (1981 Ed.), see §§ 2902 to 2918 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of applicability of §§ 32-381.1 to 32-381.17 (1981 Ed.), see § 2920 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).

Resolutions

Resolution 16-650, the “Provision of Uncompensated Care Rules Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective May 18, 2006.